Nebraska, session 109, LB154.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB154 LB154
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 38-511, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-511 Nothing in the Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology
Practice Act shall be construed to prevent or restrict:
(1) The practice of audiology or speech-language pathology or the
use of the official title of such practice by a person employed as a
speech-language pathologist or audiologist by the federal government;
(2) A physician from engaging in the practice of medicine and
surgery or any individual from carrying out any properly delegated
responsibilities within the normal practice of medicine and surgery under
the supervision of a physician;
(3) A person licensed as a hearing instrument specialist in this
state from engaging in the fitting, selling, ordering, and servicing of
hearing instruments or performing such other duties as defined in the
Hearing Instrument Specialists Practice Act;
(4) The practice of audiology or speech-language pathology or the
use of the official title of such practice by a person who holds a valid
and current credential as a speech-language pathologist or audiologist
issued by the State Department of Education, if such person performs
speech-language pathology or audiology services solely as a part of his
or her duties within an agency, institution, or organization for which no
fee is paid directly or indirectly by the recipient of such service and
under the jurisdiction of the State Department of Education, but such
person may elect to be within the jurisdiction of the Audiology and
Speech-Language Pathology Practice Act;
(5) The clinical practice in audiology or speech-language pathology
required for students enrolled in an accredited college or university
pursuing a major in audiology or speech-language pathology, if such
clinical practices are supervised by a person licensed to practice
audiology or speech-language pathology and if the student is designated
by a title such as student clinician or other title clearly indicating
-2-

LB154 LB154
2025 2025
the training status; or
(6) The utilization of a speech aide or other personnel employed by
a public school, educational service unit, or other private or public
educational institution working under the direct supervision of a
credentialed speech-language pathologist.
Sec. 2. Section 38-1501, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-1501 Sections 38-1501 to 38-1518 and sections 5, 6, and 16 to 25
of this act shall be known and may be cited as the Hearing Instrument
Specialists Practice Act.
Sec. 3. Section 38-1502, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-1502 For purposes of the Hearing Instrument Specialists Practice
Act and elsewhere in the Uniform Credentialing Act, unless the context
otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 38-1503 to 38-1507
and sections 5 and 6 of this act apply.
Sec. 4. Section 38-1504, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-1504 Hearing instrument means any wearable instrument or device
designed for, or offered for the purpose of, or represented as aiding
persons with or compensating for impaired human hearing and any parts,
attachments, or accessories, including earmold, but excluding batteries
and cords.
Sec. 5. Hearing instrument specialist means a person who engages in
the practice of ordering the use and fitting of hearing instruments.
Sec. 6. Medical liaison means an otolaryngologist or a licensed
physician, if no otolaryngologist is available, with whom a cooperative
arrangement for consultation is established by a hearing instrument
specialist.
Sec. 7. Section 38-1505, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-3-

LB154 LB154
2025 2025
38-1505 Practice of ordering the use and fitting of hearing
instruments includes the following activities:
(1) Eliciting patient case histories, including medical history,
otological history, pharmacological history, amplification history, and
patient attitudes and expectations;
(2) Administering otoscopy and, if required, cerumen removal for the
purpose of identifying possible otological conditions, including, but not
limited to, any of the conditions related to warnings found in the
regulations of the federal Food and Drug Administration, 21 C.F.R.
801.422, as such regulations existed on January 1, 2025, which may
indicate the need for a medical referral or which may have a bearing on
outcomes or recommendations;
(3) Administering and interpreting tests of human hearing performed
with an audiometer, including other appropriate objective and subjective
methodology and measures;
(4) Determining candidacy for hearing instruments, and discussing
the results of a human hearing test with the individual to inform the
individual about potential options for addressing the individual's
hearing loss, including hearing instruments, hearing-assistive devices
such as cochlear implants, or other medical interventions, and
facilitating appropriate referrals, if needed;
(5) Ordering, selecting or fitting appropriate hearing instruments
and assistive devices, including appropriate technology, programming
parameters, and special custom earpiece applications, as indicated;
(6) Assessing hearing instrument efficacy utilizing appropriate
fitting verification methodology and equipment, which may include real-
ear measures or speech mapping, and electroacoustic analysis equipment;
(7) Assessing hearing instrument benefits through appropriate
validation measures, which may include communication assessment
questionnaires or speech audiometry;
(8)(a) Taking ear impressions or electronic scans by any method used
-4-

LB154 LB154
2025 2025
for the purpose of creating earmolds and (b) preparing earmolds for
hearing instruments, assistive devices, telecommunications applications,
ear protection, and other related applications;
(9) Ordering and modifying earmolds and auditory equipment to meet a
patient's needs;
(10) Providing services in the use and care of hearing instruments
and assistive devices, including listening strategies and other
approaches to foster optimal patient results;
(11) Providing tinnitus care;
(12) Providing supervision and inservice training of those entering
the dispensing profession;
(13) Providing post-fitting care and services and hearing instrument
care and repair services; or
(14) Any other act of hearing assessment pertaining to hearing
testing, ordering the use of hearing instruments, or the selling,
renting, leasing, and delivery of hearing instruments.
Practice of fitting hearing instruments means the measurement of
human hearing by means of an audiometer or by other means approved by the
board solely for the purpose of making selections, adaptations, or sale
of hearing instruments. The term also includes the making of impressions
for earmolds. A dispenser, at the request of a physician or a member of
related professions, may make audiograms for the professional's use in
consultation with the hard-of-hearing.
Sec. 8. Section 38-1506, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-1506 Providing tinnitus care means the selection of tinnitus care
devices, as contained within the hearing instruments, and tinnitus
maskers, which shall be used only in accordance with the audiology
department staff of the manufacturer of the devices.
Sell, sale, or dispense means any transfer of title or of the right
to use by lease, bailment, or any other contract, excluding (1) wholesale
-5-

LB154 LB154
2025 2025
transactions with distributors or dispensers and (2) distribution of
hearing instruments by nonprofit service organizations at no cost to the
recipient for the hearing instrument.
Sec. 9. Section 38-1508, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-1508 The board shall consist of five professional members and one
public member appointed pursuant to section 38-158. Members The members
shall meet the requirements of sections 38-164 and 38-165. The
professional members shall consist of three licensed hearing instrument
specialists, one otolaryngologist, and one audiologist until one licensed
hearing instrument specialist vacates his or her office or his or her
term expires, whichever occurs first, at which time the professional
members of the board shall consist of three licensed hearing instrument
specialists, at least one of whom does not hold a license as an
audiologist, one otolaryngologist, and one audiologist. At the expiration
of the four-year terms of the members serving on December 1, 2008,
successors shall be appointed for five-year terms.
Sec. 10. Section 38-1509, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
38-1509 (1)(a) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, it
shall be unlawful for any person to engage in the practice of ordering
the use and fitting of no person shall engage in the sale of or practice
of fitting hearing instruments or display a sign or in any other way
advertise or represent that the person is engaged in the practice of
ordering the use and fitting himself or herself as a person who practices
the fitting and sale or dispensing of hearing instruments unless such
person he or she holds a current, an unsuspended, and unrevoked hearing
instrument specialist license issued by the department as provided in the
Hearing Instrument Specialists Practice Act. A person represents that the
person is a hearing instrument specialist if the person holds out to the
public that the person engages in the practice of ordering the use and
-6-

LB154 LB154
2025 2025
fitting of hearing instruments, by any means, or by any service or
function performed, directly or indirectly, or by using the term
audioprosthologist, hearing center, hearing instrument center, hearing
instrument office, hearing instrument specialist, hearing office, or any
variation or synonym which expresses, employs, or implies these terms or
functions.
(b) A hearing instrument specialist license shall confer upon the
holder the right to select, fit, and sell hearing instruments. A person
holding a license issued under the act prior to August 30, 2009, may
continue to practice under such license until it expires under the terms
of the license.
(2) A licensed audiologist who maintains a practice pursuant to (a)
licensure as an audiologist, or (b) a privilege to practice audiology
under the Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Interstate Compact, in
which hearing instruments are regularly dispensed, or who intends to
maintain such a practice, shall be exempt from the requirement to be
licensed as a hearing instrument specialist if the audiologist maintains
a practice in which hearing instruments are regularly dispensed, or
intends to maintain such a practice, pursuant to: .
(a) Licensure as an audiologist; or
(b) A privilege to practice audiology under the Audiology and
Speech-Language Pathology Interstate Compact.
(3) A hearing instrument specialist or audiologist may order the use
of devices pursuant to 21 C.F.R. 801.109, as such regulation existed on
January 1, 2025.
(4)(a) (3) Nothing in the Hearing Instrument Specialists Practice
Act act shall prohibit a corporation, partnership, limited liability
company, trust, association, or other like organization maintaining an
established business address from engaging in the business of selling or
offering for sale hearing instruments at retail without a license if it
employs only properly licensed natural persons in the direct sale and
-7-

LB154 LB154
2025 2025
fitting of such products.
(b) Each such organization shall file annually with the department,
on a form provided by the department, a list of the licensed hearing
instrument specialists employed by the organization and a statement, on a
form provided by the department, that the organization agrees to comply
with the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to
section 38-126.
(4) Nothing in the act shall prohibit the holder of a hearing
instrument specialist license from the fitting and sale of wearable
instruments or devices designed for or offered for the purpose of
conservation or protection of hearing.
Sec. 11. Section 38-1510, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-1510 (1) A licensed hearing instrument specialist who provides
tinnitus care or cerumen removal shall only provide such service to an
individual who is eighteen years of age or older.
(2) The Hearing Instrument Specialists Practice Act does not change
the scope of practice of a licensed audiologist.
(3) (1) The Hearing Instrument Specialists Practice Act is not
intended to prevent any person from engaging in the practice of measuring
human hearing for the purpose of selection of hearing instruments if such
person or organization employing such person does not sell hearing
instruments or the accessories thereto.
(4) (2) The Hearing Instrument Specialists Practice Act does act
shall not apply to a person who is a physician licensed to practice in
this state, except that such physician shall not delegate the authority
to fit and dispense hearing instruments unless the person to whom the
authority is delegated is licensed as a hearing instrument specialist
under the act.
Sec. 12. Section 38-1511, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-8-

LB154 LB154
2025 2025
38-1511 (1) A licensed hearing instrument specialist shall enter
into a written contract for each sale of a hearing instrument which
states the terms of the sale.
(2) A licensed hearing instrument specialist shall, at the time of
delivery of the hearing instrument, provide the patient with a receipt
containing the signature, regular business address, and license number of
the licensee; the brand, model, manufacturer or manufacturer
identification code, and serial number of the hearing instrument; and the
amount charged for the hearing instrument. The receipt shall also specify
whether the hearing instrument is new, used, or rebuilt, as provided in
21 C.F.R. 801.422, as such regulation existed on January 1, 2025; the
length of time and other terms of the guarantee; and by whom the hearing
instrument is guaranteed.
(3) No hearing instrument may be sold to any person unless both the
packaging containing the hearing instrument and the itemized receipt are
in compliance with all applicable state and federal laws and regulations.
(4) Upon delivery of the hearing instrument to any person, the
licensed hearing instrument specialist shall confirm the physical and
operational performance of the hearing instrument. If a patient purchases
a hearing instrument from a licensed hearing instrument specialist
outside of the licensee's regular place of business and the regular place
of business is beyond a reasonable distance, as determined by the board,
the licensed hearing instrument specialist shall provide the patient with
the address of an affiliate location with which the licensee is
associated that is within a reasonable distance, at which a licensed
hearing instrument specialist or audiologist is available for fitting
services.
(5) Any seller offering for sale or selling a hearing instrument in
this state or to a resident of this state shall make available in this
state an in-person fitting of the hearing instrument by a licensed
hearing instrument specialist in this state prior to the sale.
-9-

LB154 LB154
2025 2025
(1) Any person who practices the fitting and sale of hearing
instruments shall deliver to each person supplied with a hearing
instrument a receipt which shall contain the licensee's signature and
show his or her business address and the number of his or her
certificate, together with specifications as to the make and model of the
hearing instrument furnished, and clearly stating the full terms of sale.
If a hearing instrument which is not new is sold, the receipt and the
container thereof shall be clearly marked as used or reconditioned,
whichever is applicable, with terms of guarantee, if any.
(6) A receipt provided pursuant to this section (2) Such receipt
shall bear in no smaller type than the largest used in the body copy
portion the following: The purchaser has been advised at the outset of
the his or her relationship with the hearing instrument specialist that
any examination or representation made by a licensed hearing instrument
specialist in connection with the fitting and selling of this hearing
instrument is not an examination, diagnosis, or prescription by a person
licensed to practice medicine in this state and therefor must not be
regarded as medical opinion or advice.
Sec. 13. Section 38-1512, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
38-1512 (1) Any person may obtain a hearing instrument specialist
license under the Hearing Instrument Specialists Practice Act by
successfully passing a qualifying examination pursuant to section 38-1514
if the applicant provides verification to the department, on a form
provided by the department, that such person:
(a) Is at least twenty-one years of age; and
(b) Has an education equivalent to a four-year course in an
accredited high school; and .
(c)(i) Has completed the minimum number of practicum hours
prescribed by the board;
(ii) Has a two-year degree in hearing instrument sciences or an
-10-

LB154 LB154
2025 2025
equivalent as determined by the board;
(iii) Has a master's or doctoral degree in audiology from an
accredited institution approved by the board;
(iv) Has held a current, unsuspended, and unrevoked license to
dispense hearing instruments from another jurisdiction for at least
twelve of the last eighteen months prior to taking the examination;
(v) Is certified by the National Board for Certification in Hearing
Instrument Sciences at the time of taking the examination; or
(vi) Holds an advanced credential offered by the International
Hearing Society at the time of taking the examination.
(2) The department, with the recommendation of the board, may
determine whether completion of a licensure program from outside of the
United States qualifies a person to take the examination in this state.
(3) The department, upon recommendation of the board, may waive
either or both components of the examination pursuant to section 38-1514
for licensure as a hearing instrument specialist if the person has passed
the same examination as provided in section 38-1514 or a substantially
equivalent examination as determined by the board.
(4) The department, with the recommendation of the board, shall
determine whether a person has met the requirements to be eligible to
take the examination pursuant to the Hearing Instrument Specialists
Practice Act.
(2) The qualifying examination shall consist of written and
practical tests. The examination shall not be conducted in such a manner
that college training is required in order to pass. Nothing in this
examination shall imply that the applicant is required to possess the
degree of medical competence normally expected of physicians.
(3) The department shall give examinations approved by the board. A
minimum of two examinations shall be offered each calendar year.
Sec. 14. Section 38-1513, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
-11-

LB154 LB154
2025 2025
38-1513 (1) The department, with the recommendation of the board,
shall issue a temporary training license to any person who has met the
requirements for licensure as a hearing instrument specialist pursuant to
subdivisions (1)(a) and (b) subsection (1) of section 38-1512. Previous
experience or a waiting period shall not be required to obtain a
temporary training license.
(2) Any person who desires a temporary training license shall make
application to the department. The temporary training license shall be
issued for a period of one year. A person holding a valid license as a
hearing instrument specialist shall be responsible for the supervision
and training of such applicant and shall maintain adequate personal
contact with him or her.
(3) If a person who holds a temporary training license under this
section has not successfully passed the licensing examination within
twelve months of the date of issuance of the temporary training license,
the temporary training license may be renewed or reissued for a twelve-
month period. In no case may a temporary training license be renewed or
reissued more than once. A renewal or reissuance may take place any time
after the expiration of the first twelve-month period.
Sec. 15. Section 38-1514, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-1514 (1) The examination required by section 38-1512 for
licensure as a hearing instrument specialist shall be comprised of two
separate components:
(a) A written or computer-based, psychometrically valid, competency
examination approved by the board that tests the examinee for knowledge
fundamental to the practice of ordering the use and fitting of hearing
instruments, which may be an examination developed and maintained by the
International Hearing Society; and
(b) A practical examination approved by the board that requires the
examinee to demonstrate competence in the practice of ordering the use
-12-

LB154 LB154
2025 2025
and fitting of hearing instruments, which may be an examination developed
and maintained by the International Hearing Society.
(2)(a) If an examinee fails more than one portion of the practical
examination, the examinee shall retake the entire practical examination
upon payment of the examination fee.
(b) If an examinee fails only one portion of the practical
examination, the examinee may retake that portion of the examination
without payment of a fee.
(c) If an examinee fails the jurisprudence examination or competency
examination, the examinee shall retake the entire examination upon
payment of the examination fee.
(d) If an examinee fails either the practical or competency
component of the examination and fails two subsequent reexaminations, the
examinee shall be disqualified from retaking the examination a fourth
time until the examinee meets with the board, presents an acceptable
written training plan to the board for passing the components of the
examination, and successfully completes that plan.
The qualifying examination provided in section 38-1512 shall be
designed to demonstrate the applicant's adequate technical qualifications
by:
(1) Tests of knowledge in the following areas as they pertain to the
fitting and sale of hearing instruments:
(a) Basic physics of sound;
(b) The anatomy and physiology of the ear; and
(c) The function of hearing instruments; and
(2) Practical tests of proficiency in the following techniques as
they pertain to the fitting of hearing instruments:
(a) Pure tone audiometry, including air conduction testing and bone
conduction testing;
(b) Live voice or recorded voice speech audiometry;
(c) Masking when indicated;
-13-

LB154 LB154
2025 2025
(d) Recording and evaluation of audiograms and speech audiometry to
determine proper selection and adaptation of a hearing instrument; and
(e) Taking earmold impressions.
Sec. 16. (1) A licensed hearing instrument specialist shall not
engage in the practice of ordering the use and fitting of hearing
instruments with respect to a patient without first having conducted a
face-to-face hearing assessment for the patient. A hearing assessment
conducted in accordance with this subsection shall be valid for six
months. Such hearing assessment shall include at least the following
procedures, and any additional or modified procedures appropriate to
technological developments as determined by the board:
(a) Completion of a patient history questionnaire;
(b) Otoscopic examination;
(c) Testing to determine the type and degree of hearing loss that
includes pure-tone air conduction testing at two hundred fifty hertz,
five hundred hertz, one thousand hertz, two thousand hertz, four thousand
hertz, and eight thousand hertz and bone conduction testing at five
hundred hertz, one thousand hertz, two thousand hertz, and four thousand
hertz;
(d) Effective masking when indicated;
(e) Appropriate testing to determine speech reception thresholds,
word recognition scores, most comfortable listening levels, uncomfortable
loudness levels, frequency-specific loudness discomfort levels, ability
to understand speech in noise, and the selection of the best fitting
arrangement for maximum hearing instrument benefit when indicated; and
(f) Other speech tests commonly used to assess human hearing acuity.
(2) Each component of a hearing instrument shall be adapted to the
needs of the patient. A licensed hearing instrument specialist shall
conduct a final fitting to ensure physical fit and operational comfort of
the hearing instrument.
Sec. 17. A licensed hearing instrument specialist shall demonstrate
-14-

LB154 LB154
2025 2025
the benefit of a hearing instrument fitting by using objective measures,
such as aided and unaided sound field testing, real-ear measurements,
speech mapping, or electroacoustic analysis, or any additional or
modified procedures appropriate to technological developments as
determined and approved by the board.
Sec. 18. A licensed hearing instrument specialist shall determine a
patient's benefit with the hearing instrument fitting using validation
measures, such as speech audiometry and validated communication
assessment questionnaires, or any other method approved by the board.
Sec. 19. (1) A licensed hearing instrument specialist shall use the
following equipment as part of any hearing testing conducted for the
purpose of dispensing of hearing instruments:
(a) An audiometer that has been calibrated within the twelve months
preceding the test and that meets the specifications set forth under this
section; and
(b) A speech audiometer or a master hearing instrument in order to
perform speech tests as required in subdivision (1)(e) of section 16 of
this act.
(2) A licensed hearing instrument specialist shall provide for the
calibration of the equipment utilized for hearing assessments required
under section 16 of this act and in the dispensing of hearing instruments
at least annually in conformance with current standards of the American
National Standards Institute or such other quality control standards
established by the board. A licensed hearing instrument specialist shall
annually ensure that audiometric equipment has been evaluated
electrically and acoustically, that the equipment has been adjusted or
repaired if necessary, and that conformity with such standards was
determined at that time. A licensed hearing instrument specialist shall
maintain calibration records for ten years and shall make the records
available for inspection by the department at any time. A licensed
hearing instrument specialist shall also use routine procedures for the
-15-

LB154 LB154
2025 2025
daily inspection of audiometric equipment, or prior to use if used less
often than daily, to generally determine that the equipment is in normal
working order.
(3) A licensed hearing instrument specialist shall provide the
following care of the equipment used in the licensee's practice of
ordering the use and fitting of hearing instruments:
(a) Hearing instruments, assistive-listening devices, and electronic
equipment shall be maintained according to the manufacturer's
specifications;
(b) Instrumental technology shall be maintained in proper working
order and be properly calibrated according to accepted standards; and
(c) Proper infection control and sanitation procedures shall be
utilized.
Sec. 20. (1) Prior to engaging in cerumen removal, a licensed
hearing instrument specialist shall have held a valid, undisciplined
license as a licensed hearing instrument specialist for a minimum of two
consecutive years and provide the board with evidence of (a) successful
completion of a cerumen removal course pursuant to subsection (3) of this
section, (b) professional liability insurance pursuant to subsection (5)
of this section, and (c) an arrangement with a medical liaison pursuant
to subsection (2) of this section. If the licensed hearing instrument
specialist continues to engage in cerumen removal, the licensee shall
annually provide evidence to the board of professional liability
insurance and an arrangement with a medical liaison.
(2) Prior to engaging in cerumen removal, a licensed hearing
instrument specialist shall have an arrangement with a medical liaison. A
licensed hearing instrument specialist shall refer a patient to a medical
liaison if the patient exhibits contraindications to cerumen removal
requiring medical consultation or medical intervention. If a licensed
hearing instrument specialist engaged in routine cerumen removal
discovers any trauma, including, but not limited to, continuous
-16-

LB154 LB154
2025 2025
uncontrolled bleeding, lacerations, or other traumatic injuries, the
licensee shall, as soon as practicable, refer the patient to the medical
liaison.
(3)(a) Prior to entering into an arrangement with a medical liaison,
a licensed hearing instrument specialist shall complete a cerumen removal
course approved by the International Hearing Society or the American
Academy of Otolaryngology-Head and Neck Surgery, or another course
approved by the board, and provide the board with evidence of such
successful completion and attestation of competence. In order to be
approved by the board as a cerumen removal course, the course shall be
approved by the International Hearing Society or the American Academy of
Otolaryngology-Head and Neck Surgery and shall:
(i) Be overseen by a physician, preferably an otolaryngologist;
(ii) Consist of at least six hours of a participant practicing
cerumen removal from an ear canal model using a variety of safe
techniques;
(iii) Include in-person practice of cerumen removal techniques;
(iv) Include an infectious control component; and
(v) Result in a certificate of successful completion and attestation
of competence signed by such physician.
(b) The board may, only after consultation with the Board of
Medicine and Surgery, adopt rules and regulations as provided in section
38-126 to provide requirements for the initial cerumen removal course.
(4) The licensed hearing instrument specialist shall maintain
documentation evidencing the satisfactory completion of the training.
(5) A licensed hearing instrument specialist shall carry appropriate
professional liability insurance before engaging in cerumen removal.
(6) A licensed hearing instrument specialist shall perform cerumen
removal using the customary removal techniques that are commensurate with
the licensee's training and experience. Performance of cerumen removal is
limited to the patient's cartilaginous outer one-third portion of the
-17-

LB154 LB154
2025 2025
external auditory canal.
(7) A licensed hearing instrument specialist engaged in cerumen
removal shall comply with the following requirements:
(a) The indications for cerumen removal for a licensed hearing
instrument specialist shall include:
(i) Enabling audiometric testing;
(ii) Making ear impressions;
(iii) Fitting ear protection or prosthetic devices; and
(iv) Monitoring continuous use of hearing aids;
(b) The licensed hearing instrument specialist shall refer a patient
to the medical liaison, an otolaryngologist, or a licensed physician for
medical consultation or medical intervention if the patient exhibits any
of the following contraindications to cerumen removal:
(i) The patient is younger than eighteen years of age;
(ii) The patient has a perforated tympanic membrane;
(iii) The patient has a history of pain or active drainage or
bleeding from the ear;
(iv) There is evidence of congenital or traumatic deformity of the
ear;
(v) The patient has any previous ear surgery;
(vi) The patient has tympanostomy tubes, such that irrigation should
not be used;
(vii) The patient has a bleeding disorder;
(viii) The patient has an actual or suspected foreign body in the
ear;
(ix) The patient has a stenosis or bony exostosis of the ear canal;
(x) The patient has a tympanic membrane that the licensed hearing
instrument specialist is unable to see; or
(xi) There is any other contraindication to cerumen removal that
requires medical consultation or medical intervention; and
(c) If the patient, while undergoing cerumen removal that did not
-18-

LB154 LB154
2025 2025
present contraindications, complains of significant pain, exhibits
uncontrolled bleeding or a laceration of the external auditory canal, or
notices the acute onset of dizziness or vertigo or sudden hearing loss,
the licensed hearing instrument specialist shall immediately stop the
procedure and refer the patient to the medical liaison, an
otolaryngologist, or a licensed physician.
(8) The licensed hearing instrument specialist shall maintain the
following proper infection control practices:
(a) Universal health precautions;
(b) Decontamination;
(c) Cleaning, disinfection, and sterilization of multiple-use
equipment; and
(d) Universal precautions for prevention of the transmission of
human immunodeficiency virus, hepatitis B virus, and other bloodborne
pathogens, as defined by occupational safety and health standards
promulgated pursuant to 29 C.F.R. 1910, as such regulations existed on
January 1, 2025.
(9) The licensed hearing instrument specialist who performs cerumen
removal shall maintain a case history for every patient and informed
consent signed by the patient as part of the patient's records.
(10) The licensed hearing instrument specialist shall carry
appropriate professional liability insurance before performing cerumen
removal.
(11) The licensed hearing instrument specialist is prohibited from
requiring patients to sign any form that eliminates liability if the
patient is harmed.
(12) A licensed hearing instrument specialist who first passes the
initial training in cerumen removal shall take one additional hour of
continuing education specific to cerumen removal annually, by any
approved means, in addition to the required continuing education
requirements for the license as a licensed hearing instrument specialist.
-19-

LB154 LB154
2025 2025
Sec. 21. A licensed hearing instrument specialist shall advise a
prospective hearing instrument user to consult promptly with an
otolaryngologist, or a licensed physician if no otolaryngologist is
available, before dispensing a hearing instrument if the licensee
determines, through inquiry, actual observation, or review of any other
available information concerning the prospective user, that the
prospective user has any of the conditions related to warnings found in
the regulations of the federal Food and Drug Administration, 21 C.F.R.
801.422, as such regulations existed on January 1, 2025.
Sec. 22. It is a condition of licensure under the Hearing
Instrument Specialists Practice Act that a licensed hearing instrument
specialist comply with the rules of the federal Food and Drug
Administration governing the ordering of the use, fitting, and sales of
hearing instruments as prescribed by 21 C.F.R. 801.422, as such
regulations existed on January 1, 2025.
Sec. 23. A purchaser of a hearing instrument shall not be required
to obtain a medical evaluation for the repurchase of a hearing instrument
once a medical evaluation has been obtained for certain otologic
conditions that are permanent and would be reidentified at each hearing
assessment. Such conditions shall include, but not be limited to:
(1) Visible congenital or traumatic deformity of the ear;
(2) Unilateral or asymmetric hearing loss, assuming no change in
thresholds; and
(3) Audiometric air-bone gap equal to or greater than an average of
fifteen decibels at five hundred hertz, one thousand hertz, and two
thousand hertz.
Sec. 24. (1) A licensed hearing instrument specialist shall keep
and maintain in the licensee's office or place of business the following
records:
(a) Results of tests and other records as they pertain to hearing
assessments conducted by the licensed hearing instrument specialist and
-20-

LB154 LB154
2025 2025
the dispensing of hearing instruments by the licensed hearing instrument
specialist;
(b) A copy of the written contract and, if executed, signed medical
evaluation waiver; and
(c) Copies of such other records as the department, with the
recommendation of the board, reasonably requires.
(2) Any such record shall be kept and maintained by the licensed
hearing instrument specialist for a period of seven years after the date
the record was produced.
Sec. 25. A licensed hearing instrument specialist who is certified
by the National Board for Certification in Hearing Instrument Sciences or
has an advanced credential recognized or offered by the International
Hearing Society may work for a company or organization as a trainer and
provide specialized training in the practical application of hearing
instrument sciences.
Sec. 26. Original sections 38-511, 38-1501, 38-1502, 38-1504,
38-1505, 38-1506, 38-1508, 38-1510, 38-1511, and 38-1514, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 38-1509, 38-1512, and 38-1513, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-21-